Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1682.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 613.1. General Appropriation Bill Compensation 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Suspension.--(a) If a general appropriation bill is not enacted by June 30 of a fiscal year for the subsequent fiscal year, compensation for the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and members of the General Assembly shall be suspended until a general appropriation bill has been enacted.(b) Upon enactment of a general appropriation bill, compensation suspended under subsection (a) shall be paid retroactively to July 1.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1682PN2058 - 2 - 123456789